Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2566XS (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 345 Section 1. Section 299.1, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. a. The board of directors of a public school district 3 shall adopt a policy related to absenteeism and truancy. The 4 policy must satisfy all of the following requirements: 5 (1) The policy must allow for excused absences due to 6 illness, medical appointments, family emergencies, religious 7 observances, and preapproved educational opportunities. 8 (2) The policy must define what an unexcused absence is, the 9 criteria the board of directors will use to determine whether 10 an absence is unexcused, and the penalties associated with 11 unexcused absences. 12 (3) The policy must include general attendance 13 requirements. 14 (4) The policy must describe the interventions the board 15 of directors may use if a student becomes chronically absent, 16 which may include personalized support plans and how the board 17 of directors will implement such plans to support students and 18 families. 19 b. The policy may contain attendance requirements that are 20 more stringent than the attendance requirements established 21 under this chapter . 22 c. The board of directors of a public school district shall 23 review attendance data and make modifications to the policy 24 described in paragraph âaâ when appropriate. 25 Sec. 2. Section 299.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsections: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. Who is a military applicant undergoing 28 military entrance processing. 29 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Who is engaged in military service. 30 Sec. 3. Section 299.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 31 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 32 Any person who violates the terms of an absenteeism 33 prevention plan entered into under section 299.12 , who is 34 referred for prosecution under section 299.12 and is convicted 35 -1- LSB 2566XS (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 345 of a violation of any of the provisions of sections 299.1 1 through 299.5 , who violates any of the provisions of sections 2 299.1 through 299.5 , or who refuses to participate in a school 3 engagement meeting under section 299.12 , commits a public 4 offense. 5 Sec. 4. REPEAL. Sections 299.1C, 299.12, and 299.13, Code 6 2025, are repealed. 7